Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1050.
do enact as follows:SB1050,14Section 1. 118.235 (title) of the statutes is created to read:SB1050,1,55118.235 (title) Nonclassroom teacher time; compensation.SB1050,21Section 2. 118.235 of the statutes is renumbered 118.235 (1).SB1050,32Section 3. 118.235 (2) of the statutes is created to read:SB1050,2,53118.235 (2) Other nonclassroom teacher time. No school board may 4require its teachers to perform any services outside of regular classroom instruction 5unless the school board compensates a teacher for the teacher’s time.SB1050,46Section 4. 119.04 (1) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 79, is 7amended to read:SB1050,2,218119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 966.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 10115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 11115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06, 118.07, 118.075, 118.076, 118.10, 12118.12, 118.124, 118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 118.162, 13118.163, 118.164, 118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 118.235, 14118.24 (1), (2) (c) to (f), (6), (8), and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.291, 118.292, 15118.293, 118.2935, 118.30 to 118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 118.53, 118.55, 16118.56, 118.58, 120.12 (2m), (4m), (5), (15) to (27), and (29), 120.125, 120.13 (1), (2) 17(b) to (g), (3), (14), (17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 120.137, 120.14, 18120.20, 120.21 (3), and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city school district and 19board but not, unless explicitly provided in this chapter or in the terms of a 20contract, to the commissioner or to any school transferred to an opportunity schools 21and partnership program.SB1050,522Section 5. Initial applicability.SB1050,3,223(1) This act first applies to a teacher who is affected by a collective bargaining 24agreement or other contract that contains provisions inconsistent with this act on 1the day on which the collective bargaining agreement or contract expires or is 2extended, modified, or renewed, whichever occurs first.SB1050,3,33